Massachusetts, session 194th, S1483.
Be it enacted by the Senate and House of Representatives in General Court assembled, and by the authority
of the same, as follows:
SECTION 1. Chapter 94 of the General Laws is hereby amended by adding the following
section:-
Section 330. (a) For the purposes of the section the following words shall have the
following meanings:
“Ingredient”, an intentionally added substance present in the menstrual product.
“Menstrual product”, a product used to collect menstruation and vaginal discharge
including, but not limited to, tampons, pads, menstrual cups, disks, sponges and menstrual
underwear, whether disposable or reusable.
of 3

“Manufacturer”, (i) a person or entity that manufactures a menstrual product and whose
name appears on the product label; or (ii) a person or entity for whom the product is
manufactured or distributed, as identified on the product label pursuant to 15 U.S.C. chapter 39
the Fair Packaging and Labeling Act.
(b) On each package or box, containing menstrual products manufactured for sale or
distribution in the commonwealth, a manufacturer shall have printed a label with a plain and
conspicuous list of all ingredients, which shall be listed in order of predominance. The label shall
be typed in visible print, a minimum font size of 10 points and displayed on the outside of the
package or box.
(c) A manufacturer shall change the label on a menstrual product because of a change to
an ingredient or addition of a new ingredient.
(d) A manufacturer of a menstrual product that is manufactured for sale or distribution in
the commonwealth shall post on an internet website, in an electronically readable format, the
ingredient information that is required to be disclosed on a package or box containing menstrual
products pursuant to subsection (b).
(e) A manufacturer shall revise information disclosed online due to a change in an
ingredient or addition of a new ingredient.
(f) The requirements of this section shall apply in addition to any other labeling
requirements established pursuant to the General Laws.
(g) Whoever manufactures a menstrual product in violation of this section shall be
punished by a fine of $1,000 dollars.
of 3

SECTION 2. This act shall take effect 12 months upon passage.
of 3